District of Columbia statutes.
7-2308

Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act to emergency executive order.

No action taken pursuant to an emergency executive order issued by the Mayor pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to § 2-509, until after the expiration date of the emergency executive order.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-149, § 9, 27 DCR 4886
1981 Ed., § 6-1508.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of D.C. Act 8-5, see § 7 of Temporary Curfew Temporary Act of 1989 (D.C. Law 8-13, March 15, 1989, law notification 36 DCR 4558).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Emergency Management Assistance Compact Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-140, May 21, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 5057).
For temporary (90 day) emergency management assistance compact, see § 2 of Emergency Management Assistance Compact Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-281, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2296).
For temporary (90 day) addition of provisions, see §§ 2 and 3 of Emergency Management Assistance Compact Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-362, May 20, 2002, 49 DCR 5061).